Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 51.5-60.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Blind person”
means a person who has central visual acuity of 20/200 or less in the better eye, as measured with best correction, or a limitation in the field of vision of the better eye, such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle of 20 degrees or less.

“Board”
means the Board for the Blind and Vision Impaired.

“Business enterprise”
means any business other than a vending stand.

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner of the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired.

“Custodian”
means any person or group of persons having the authority to grant permission for the installation and operation of vending stands and other business enterprises.

“Department”
means the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired.

“Direct labor”
means all work required for the preparation, processing and assembling of goods or articles including the packaging and packing thereof, but not including time spent in the supervision, administration, inspection and shipping of such operations, or in the production of component materials by other than blind persons.

“Goods or articles made by blind persons”
means goods or articles in the manufacture of which not less than seventy-five percent of the total hours of direct labor is performed by a blind person or persons.

“Nominee”
means any nonprofit corporation familiar with work for the blind and in the placement of the blind.

“Public and private buildings and other properties throughout the Commonwealth”
means (i) buildings, land, or other property owned by or leased to the Commonwealth other than rights-of-way for interstate highways or (ii) buildings, land, or other property owned by or leased to a political subdivision, including a municipality, or a corporation or individual.

“Vending machine”
means a coin or currency operated machine that dispenses articles or services, except that those machines operated by the United States Postal Service for the sale of postage stamps or other postal products and services, machines providing services of a recreational nature, and telephones shall not be considered to be vending machines.

“Vending stand”
means an installation in any public or private building for the sale of newspapers, periodicals, confections, tobacco products, soft drinks, ice cream, wrapped foods and such other articles as may be approved by the custodian thereof and the Department.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-204.1, 63-204.25; 1954, c. 71; 1966, c. 169; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-142, 63.1-166; 1970, c. 50; 1980, c. 4, § 63.1-69.1; 1984, c. 498; 1985, c. 255; 1988, c. 126; 1990, c. 385, § 63.1-75.1; 1992, c. 755; 1993, c. 923; 2000, c. 498; 2002, c. 747; 2019, c. 88.

Cross references.

As to intentional interferences with a guide or leader dog, see § 3.2-6588.

Effective date.

This chapter become effective October 1, 2002.

Editor’s note.

In accordance with § 30-149 of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Code Commission undertook the recodification of Title 63.1 of the Code of Virginia. This title, dealing with social services, was last revised in 1968. Since that time, the Department of Social Services has undergone extensive administrative and programmatic changes, including welfare reform. Revising this title provided an opportunity to delete provisions made obsolete by federal law and to update nomenclature. Also, the Departments of Blind and Vision Impaired and Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing were transferred out of Title 63.1 and into Title 51.5.

The Virginia Code Commission began working on this recodification in 2000. Staff utilized informal work groups made up of Department of Social Services staff and others with expertise in the field of social services to assist staff in making recommendations to the Code Commission. A draft report detailing the work of the Virginia Code Commission between June 2000 and October 2001 was circulated for public comment. The Commission completed its work on Title 63.1 and the recodification bill was introduced and passed at the 2002 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor, as Acts 2002, Chapter 747.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections.

The case notes appearing under new
sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law.

For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 88 rewrote the introductory paragraph and the definition for “Blind person,” which read: “The following terms whenever used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively set forth unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context: ‘Blind person’ means a person having not better than 20/200 central visual acuity in the better eye measured at twenty feet with correcting lenses or having visual acuity greater than 20/200 but with the widest diameter of the visual field in the better eye subtending an angle of no greater than twenty degrees, measured at a distance of thirty-three centimeters using a three-millimeter white test object, or a Goldman III-4e target, or other equivalent equipment. Such blindness shall be certified by a duly licensed physician or optometrist.”